South Dakota, session 2026, SB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-24-1 be AMENDED:
12-24-1. Before eleven a.m. central time on the day designated by Congress for
the election of the president and vice president of the United States, each presidential
elector shall notify the Governor that the elector is:
(1) At the seat of government; and
(2) Ready to perform the duties of a presidential elector.
Upon receipt of the notice, the Governor shall deliver to the electors present a
certificate listing the names of the presidential electors.
Section 2. That § 12-24-2 be AMENDED:
12-24-2. If a vacancy occurs before the day of the meeting of the electors, the
state chairperson of the political party that nominated the elector must provide a list of
up to three alternative electors who are available to be present at the meeting of the
electors, from which the remaining electors must consider and vote for one alternative
elector to fill the vacant elector position.
If an elector named in the Governor's certificate fails to appear before nine a.m.
central time on the day designated by Congress for the election of the president and vice
president of the United States, the electors present must immediately elect, by ballot, an
individual to fill the vacancy. If more than one individual receives an equal number of
votes, the Governor must, in the presence of the remaining electors, name one of the
individuals receiving an equal number of votes to fill the vacancy. If the Governor is not
present or is one of the remaining electors, the secretary of state must name one of the
individuals receiving an equal number of votes to fill the vacancy.

26.613.12 2 101
If two electors named in the Governor's certificate fail to appear before nine a.m.
central time on the day designated by Congress for the election of the president and vice
president of the United States, the Governor, or in the absence of the Governor, the
secretary of state, must immediately appoint an elector. Upon appointment, the electors
must immediately elect, by ballot, an individual to fill the remaining vacancy, in
accordance with this section.
If no electors named in the Governor's certificate appear before nine a.m. central
time on the day designated by Congress for the election of the president and vice president
of the United States, the Governor, or in the absence of the Governor, the secretary of
state, must immediately appoint an elector. Upon appointment, the elector must
immediately appoint a second elector. Upon appointment of the second elector, the
electors must immediately elect, by ballot, an individual to fill the remaining vacancy, in
accordance with this section.
Section 3. That § 12-24-3 be AMENDED:
12-24-3. Immediately after the choice of elector is made, the name of the
individual chosen to fill the vacancy must be certified to the Governor by the electors
making the choice. The Governor shall cause notice to be immediately given, in writing,
to the individual chosen to fill the vacancy. If the Governor is not present, the secretary
of state shall notify the individual chosen to fill the vacancy.
The individual chosen to fill the vacancy shall meet the other electors at the time
and place set forth in § 12-24-1 to discharge the duties enjoined upon the individual as
an elector, by the Constitution and laws of the United States and of this state.
Section 4. That § 12-24-4 be AMENDED:
12-24-4. At twelve p.m. central time on the day designated by Congress for the
election of the president and vice president of the United States, the presidential electors
shall meet at the seat of government of this state and perform the duties enjoined upon
them by the Constitution and laws of the United States.
Except as provided in section 8 of this Act, each presidential elector shall vote for
the candidates for the office of president and vice president of the United States whose
slate of electors received the highest number of votes at the state's general election.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 12:
SB101 ENROLLED

26.613.12 3 101
Each presidential elector nominated pursuant to § 12-5-21 shall execute the
following pledge upon nomination: "If selected for the position of presidential elector, I
agree to serve and to mark my ballots for the candidates nominated for the offices of
president and vice president of the United States, by the party that nominated me to the
office of presidential elector." The executed pledges must accompany the submission of
the corresponding names to the secretary of state.
Each presidential elector of an unaffiliated or independent presidential candidate
shall execute the following pledge upon nomination: "If selected for the position of
presidential elector for an unaffiliated or independent presidential candidate, I agree to
serve and to mark my ballots for that candidate and for that candidate's vice-presidential
running mate." The executed pledges must accompany the submission of the
corresponding names to the secretary of state.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 12:
At least six days before the day designated by Congress for the election of the
president and vice president of the United States, the Governor shall issue a certificate of
ascertainment of appointment. The Governor shall certify the names of the individuals
chosen at the general election to be electors and that the individuals chosen are to serve
as electors unless a vacancy occurs, pursuant to section 7 of this Act.
If a vacancy occurs in the office of elector after the Governor issues the certificate
of ascertainment, a replacement elector must be selected pursuant to § 12-24-2. Upon
the selection of a replacement elector, the Governor must immediately create and submit
a new certificate of ascertainment stating the names of the final list of the state's electors
in accordance with 3 U.S.C. § 5 (January 1, 2026). If the Governor is not present, the
secretary of state must immediately create and submit the new certificate of
ascertainment.
Any final certificate of vote must be signed by each elector on the final list and
must be immediately transmitted with the final certificate of ascertainment pursuant to 3
U.S.C. §§ 9 to 11, inclusive (January 1, 2026).
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 12:
The office of presidential elector becomes vacant if the elector:
(1) Dies;
(2) Resigns;
(3) Fails to qualify, as provided by law;
SB101 ENROLLED

26.613.12 4 101
(4) Fails to appear at the designated time and place of the meeting;
(5) Refuses to vote;
(6) Attempts to cast a blank ballot; or
(7) Except as provided for in section 8 of this Act, attempts to vote for any candidate
other than the candidate whose slate of electors received the highest number of
votes in the state's general election.
If a presidential elector casts a ballot that results in the office of elector becoming
vacant, the ballot may not be accepted or counted. An elector may resign the office of
presidential elector by submitting a letter of resignation to the secretary of state.
Section 8. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 12:
If, between the date of the general election and the date designated by Congress
for the election of the president and vice president of the United States, the candidate for
the president or vice president whose slate of electors received the highest number of
votes in the state's general election withdraws, dies, or, because of a permanent disability,
becomes unable to discharge the powers and duties of the office to which the candidate
is elected, each presidential elector from this state must vote for the replacement
candidate nominated according to the bylaws of the party to which the previous candidate
belonged.
Section 9. Pursuant to § 2-16-9, the code counsel of the Legislative Research Council shall
transfer chapter 12-24 as follows: § 12-24-1 to § 12-24A-3; § 12-24-2 to § 12-24A-5; 12-
24-3 to § 12-24A-6; § 12-24-4 to § 12-24A-7; § 12-24-5 to § 12-24A-9.
Section 10. Pursuant to § 2-16-9, the Code Commission and code counsel of the Legislative
Research Council shall correct and integrate all cross references from chapter 12-24 that have
been transferred pursuant to this Act.
SB101 ENROLLED

26.613.12 5 101
An Act to amend provisions pertaining to the duties of presidential electors.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 101
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 101 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB101 ENROLLED